Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-108
Drainage improvements; plat; profile; requisites; surveyor's report.

The plat provided for in section 31-107 shall be drawn upon a scale sufficiently large to represent all the meanderings of the proposed improvement, and shall show the boundary lines of each lot or tract of land, and of each road or railroad to be benefited thereby, the name of the owner of each lot or tract of land as it then appears on the tax duplicate, the authority or company having in charge or controlling each public or corporate road or railroad, the distance in feet through each tract or parcel of land, and such other matters as the surveyor or engineer deems material. The profile shall show the surface, the grade line, and the gradient fixed. The surveyor or engineer shall file his report with the county clerk within thirty days after making the survey and level.

Laws 1881, c. 51, § 9, p. 238;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 9, p. 456;

R.S.1913, § 1725;

C.S.1922, § 1672;

C.S.1929, § 31-108;

R.S.1943, § 31-108.